Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 3. Mississippi Water Resources Council.

§§ 51-3-101 through 51-3-105.
Repealed.

Repealed by operation of law, Laws of 2007, ch. 541 § 7, effective July 1, 2009.

§51-3-101. [Laws, 1992, ch. 545 § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 584, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1999, ch. 479, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2003, ch. 358, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 541, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.]

§51-3-103. [Laws, 1992, ch. 545 § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 584, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1999, ch. 479, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2003, ch. 358, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 541, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.]

§51-3-105. [Laws, 1992, ch. 545 § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 584, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1999, ch. 479, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2003, ch. 358, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 541, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2007.]

§ 51-3-106.
Repeal of sections 51-3-101 through 51-3-105.

Sections 51-3-101 through 51-3-105 shall stand repealed after July 1, 2009.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 584, § 5; Laws, 1999, ch. 479, § 4; Laws, 2003, ch. 358, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 541, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 51-3-107.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 584, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

[Laws, 1992, ch. 545 § 4]